Indiana, session 2026, HB1207.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 9-30-7-3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) This section does not apply
to a fatal accident. A law enforcement officer shall offer a portable
breath test or chemical test to any person who the officer has reason to
believe operated a vehicle that was involved in a fatal accident or an
accident involving serious bodily injury. If:
(1) the results of a portable breath test indicate the presence of
alcohol;
(2) the results of a portable breath test do not indicate the
presence of alcohol but the law enforcement officer has probable
cause to believe the person is under the influence of a controlled
substance or another drug; or
(3) the person refuses to submit to a portable breath test;
the law enforcement officer shall offer a chemical test to the person.
(b) A law enforcement officer shall offer a chemical test to any
person who the officer has reason to believe operated a vehicle that
was involved in a fatal accident.
2026 IN 1207—LS 6821/DI 151


(b) (c) A law enforcement officer may offer a person more than one
(1) portable breath test or chemical test under this section. However, all
chemical tests must be administered within three (3) hours after the
fatal accident or the accident involving serious bodily injury.
(c) (d) It is not necessary for a law enforcement officer to offer a
portable breath test or chemical test to an unconscious person.
2026 IN 1207—LS 6821/DI 151